District of Columbia statutes.
2-108

Revocation or suspension of certificate.

The Boiler Inspector may in his discretion revoke or suspend the certificate of inspection provided in § 2-105 if at any time he shall find any boiler or unfired pressure vessel covered by such certificate to be unsafe or unfit for operation.

June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1918, ch. 802, § 7
1981 Ed., § 1-1008.
1973 Ed., § 1-708.